Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CARE FOR CLINICIANS GRANT.new text end new text begin $....... is appropriated in fiscal year 2026 from the general fund to the commissioner of health for a grant to the Minnesota Medical Association to conduct a "Treat Yourself First" campaign. The campaign must be an awareness and education campaign focused on burnout and well-being of health care workers designed to: (1) reduce the stigma of receiving mental health services; (2) encourage health care workers who are experiencing workplace-related fatigue to receive the care they need; and (3) normalize the process for seeking help. The campaign must be targeted to health care professionals, including but not limited to physicians, nurses, dentists, pharmacists, and other members of the health care team. The campaign must include resources for health care professionals seeking help to address burnout and well-being. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until July 1, 2030. new text end